Tennessee, session 114, SB1698.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-16-301, is amended by deleting
subdivision (d)(2), substituting the following, and redesignating subdivision (d)(3) appropriately:
(2)
(A) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision (d)(2), criminal
impersonation under subsection (b) is a Class A misdemeanor.
(B) Criminal impersonation of a law enforcement officer under subsection
(b) that occurs while the defendant is operating a motor vehicle pursuant to § 55-
9-201(d), § 55-9-402(g), or § 55-9-414(f) is a Class A misdemeanor, and,
notwithstanding § 40-35-111, the maximum fine for the offense is five thousand
dollars ($5,000).
(C) Criminal impersonation of a law enforcement officer under subsection
(b) that occurs while the defendant is committing or attempting to commit a crime
of violence is a Class E felony. As used in this subdivision (d)(2)(C), "crime of
violence" means the same as defined in § 39-17-1301.
(3) Criminal impersonation under subsection (c) is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1698
008747
- 1 -